Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska58-804
Authority, defined.

Authority means the Nebraska Educational, Health, Cultural, and Social Services Finance Authority created by the Nebraska Educational, Health, Cultural, and Social Services Finance Authority Act or any board, body, commission, department, or office succeeding to the principal functions thereof or to whom the powers conferred upon such authority by the act are given by law.

Laws 1981, LB 321, § 4;

Laws 1993, LB 465, § 4;

R.S.1943, (1994), § 79-2904;

Laws 1995, LB 5, § 4;

R.S.1943, (2008), § 85-1704;

Laws 2013, LB170, § 4;

Laws 2019, LB224, § 4.